District of Columbia statutes.
5-711

Application of amendment to § 5-710.

The amendment made by Pub. L. 96-122, § 204(a)(1), to § 5-710 shall not apply with respect to officers and members of the Metropolitan Police force or the Fire Department of the District of Columbia who apply for disability retirement under § 5-710 prior to the end of the 90-day period beginning on November 17, 1979. The amendment made by Pub. L. 96-122, § 204(a)(2), to § 5-710 shall not apply with respect to injuries incurred or diseases first diagnosed prior to the end of such 90-day period.

History

Nov. 17, 1979, 93 Stat. 866, Pub. L. 96-122, § 204(c)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-617.
1973 Ed., § 4-527.1.